Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Crimes, Offenses and Civil Liabilities of Public Utilities,Officers and Employees

§ 37-12-201.
Failure to obey orders of commission, provisions of statutes.

Every public utility and all officers, agents and employees of any public utility, and every person shall obey, observe and comply with every lawful order made by the commission under authority of this act so long as the same shall be and remain in force. Any public utility, or any officer, agent or employee thereof, or any person who shall violate any provision of this act, or shall fail, omit or neglect to obey, observe or comply with any lawful order or any direction or any requirement of the commission shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each and every offense; every violation of any such order or requirement of this act shall be a separate and distinct offense and in case of a continuing violation, every day’s continuance thereof shall be and be deemed to be a separate and distinct offense.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 65; C.S. 1920, § 5517; R.S. 1931, § 94-165; C.S. 1945, § 64-401; W.S. 1957, § 37-260.

Cross references. —

For another provision relating to failure to obey orders of commission, see §

37-12-212

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note under §

37-2-110

.

Cited

in

Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929).

§ 37-12-202.
Public utility personnel violating or aiding or abetting in violations.

Every officer, agent or employee of any public utility, who shall violate, or who shall procure, aid or abet any violation by any public utility of any provision of this act, or who shall fail to obey, observe and comply with any lawful order of the commission, or any provision of any lawful order of the commission, or who shall procure, aid, or abet any public utility in its failure to obey, observe and comply with any such order or provision, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each offense.

Every officer, agent or employee of any public utility who violates or fails to comply with, or procures, aids or abets any violation by any public utility of any provision of this act, or who fails to obey, observe or comply with any order, decision, rule, direction, demand or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, of the commission, or who procures, aids or abets any public utility in its failure to obey, observe and comply with any such order, decision, rule, direction, demand or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, in a case in which a penalty has not hereinbefore been provided for, such officer, agent or employee is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 66; C.S. 1920, § 5518; R.S. 1931, § 94-166; C.S. 1945, § 64-402.; Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 74; C.S. 1920, § 5526; R.S. 1931, § 94-174; C.S. 1945, § 64-410; W.S. 1957, § 37-261.

Editor's notes. —

Because of the similarity in the provisions of §§ 66 and 74, ch. 146, Laws 1915, they were combined in the 1957 compilation and this compilation to form a single section consisting of 2 subsections, each carrying its own historical citation.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

37-12-201

.

§ 37-12-203.
Giving or receiving preferences.

Any natural person who knowingly authorizes, gives or affords any benefit, preference or advantage, or who knowingly receives or participates directly or indirectly in any benefit, preference or advantage from such offense, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each offense.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 67; C.S. 1920, § 5519; R.S. 1931, § 94-167; C.S. 1945, § 64-403; W.S. 1957, § 37-262.

Cross references. —

As to discrimination generally, see §§

40-4-101

to

40-4-123

.

§ 37-12-204.
Refusal to file report or answer questions.

Any public utility which refuses to make and file any report called for by the commission within the time specified, or within the time extended, as the case may be, or willfully refuses to answer to any question propounded by the commissioner shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each offense.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 68; C.S. 1920, § 5520; R.S. 1931, § 94-168; C.S. 1945, § 64-404; W.S. 1957, § 37-263.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for failure to file reports in connection with public service commission, see §

37-2-203

.

§ 37-12-205.
Making false returns.

Any person who willfully makes any false return or report to the commission, or to any member, agent or employee thereof, and any person who aids or abets such person, is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be imprisoned as the court may direct for a term not exceeding five (5) years for each offense.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 69; C.S. 1920, § 5521; R.S. 1931, § 94-169; C.S. 1945, § 64-405; W.S. 1957, § 37-264.

§ 37-12-206.
Hindering investigation.

Any person who willfully obstructs or hinders the commission or a member thereof, or an authorized agent or examiner in making an inspection, examination or investigation of the accounts, records, memoranda, books or papers of any public utility, or of the property or facilities thereof is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisoned as the court may direct for a term not exceeding five (5) years.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 70; C.S. 1920, § 5522; R.S. 1931, § 94-170; C.S. 1945, § 64-406; W.S. 1957, § 37-265.

§ 37-12-207.
Divulging information; exception.

Any regular or special employee of the commission who divulges any facts or information coming to his knowledge respecting an inspection, examination or investigation of any account, record, memoranda, book or paper or of the property and facilities of a public utility, except insofar as he may be authorized by the commission or by a court of competent jurisdiction, or the judge thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 71; C.S. 1920, § 5523; R.S. 1931, § 94-171; C.S. 1945, § 64-407; W.S. 1957, § 37-266.

Cross references. —

As to order of commission to prevent violations of laws or regulations, see §

37-2-120

.

As to court action to prevent violations, see §

37-2-215

.

As to criminal penalties for violation of laws or orders of commission, see §§

37-12-211

,

37-12-212

.

Cited

in

Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929).

§ 37-12-208.
Utility liable for loss or damage.

In case any public utility shall do, cause to be done, or permit to be done, any act, matter or thing prohibited, forbidden or declared to be unlawful, or shall omit to do any act, matter or thing required to be done by this act, or by any lawful order of the commission, such public utility shall be liable to the persons affected thereby for the amount of all loss, damage or injury caused thereby or resulting therefrom. An action to recover for such loss, damage or injury may be brought in any district court in this state by any person.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 72; C.S. 1920, § 5524; R.S. 1931, § 94-172; C.S. 1945, § 64-408; W.S. 1957, § 37-267.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

37-12-201

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of res ipsa loquitur doctrine to accidents incurred by passenger while boarding or alighting from a carrier, 93 ALR3d 776.

Liability of one other than electric power or light company or its employee for interruption, failure, or inadequacy of electric power, 15 ALR4th 1148.

Liability of telephone company for mistakes in or omissions from its directory, 47 ALR4th 882.

Products liability: electricity, 60 ALR4th 732.

§ 37-12-209.
Accepting rebates.

Any person receiving service from any public utility subject to the provisions of this act, who shall knowingly by an employee, agent, officer or otherwise, directly or indirectly, by or through any means or device whatsoever, receive or accept from such public utility any sum of money or other valuable consideration as rebate or offset against the regular charge for such service as fixed by the schedule of rates provided for in this act, shall in addition to any penalty provided for by this act, forfeit to the state a sum of money three (3) times the amount of money so received or accepted and three (3) times the value of any other consideration so received or accepted, to be ascertained by the trial court; and the attorney general of the state, or the attorney of the commission under its direction shall institute in the name of the state in the district court of the county in which the commission has its principal offices a civil action to collect the said sum or sums so forfeited as aforesaid; in the trial of the said action, all such rebate or other consideration so received or accepted subsequent to the passage of this act for a period of three (3) years prior to the commencement of the action may be included therein; the amount of the recovery shall be three (3) times the total amount of money or three (3) times the total value of such consideration received or accepted, or both, as the case may be.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 76; C.S. 1920, § 5528; R.S. 1931, § 94-176; C.S. 1945, § 64-412; W.S. 1957, § 37-268.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

37-12-201

.

§ 37-12-210.
Perjury.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement of fact under oath, whether oral or in writing, as required by this act, is guilty of perjury and upon conviction shall be punished as provided for in the perjury statutes of this state.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 77; C.S. 1920, § 5529; R.S. 1931, § 94-177; C.S. 1945, § 64-413; W.S. 1957, § 37-269.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to perjury generally, see §

6-5-301

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

37-12-201

.

§ 37-12-211.
Penalty for violations by utility; other offenses.

Any public utility which violates or fails to comply with any provision of this act, or which fails, omits or neglects to obey, observe or comply with any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, of the commission, in a case in which a penalty has not hereinbefore been provided for, such public utility is subject to a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each and every offense.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 73; C.S. 1920, § 5525; R.S. 1931, § 14-173; C.S. 1945, § 64-409; W.S. 1957, § 37-270.

Cross references. —

As to order of commission to prevent violations of laws or regulations, see §

37-2-120

.

As to court action to prevent violations of laws or orders of commission, see §

37-2-215

.

As to liability of utility for loss or damage caused by violation of laws or orders of commission, see §

37-12-208

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

37-12-201

.

§ 37-12-212.
Additional penalties.

Every public utility, all officers and agents of any public utility, and every person shall obey, observe and comply with every provision of this act and with every order made by the commission under authority of this act and duly served in accordance with its provisions so long as the same shall be and remain in force. Any public utility or its officers or agents, and any other persons, who shall knowingly and willfully violate any of the provisions of this act is punishable as a misdemeanor or felony, or who fails, omits or neglects to obey, observe or comply with any order or any direction or requirement of the commission, shall (in addition to liability to the party aggrieved for all damages sustained by reason of such violation) forfeit to the state not to exceed the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each and every violation, or in case of a violation which is punishable as a misdemeanor or felony, not to exceed the maximum sum fixed as a fine therefor, which shall be recovered in an action at law to the use of the state upon the complaint of the commission appearing by its attorney or the attorney general; but no such action shall be maintained unless brought within two (2) years after the date of such violation; nor shall such an action be maintained in the case of a person who has already been convicted for the same violation of this act, and recovery by civil action brought in accordance with this section shall not be a bar to any criminal prosecution for the same violation of this act.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 75; C.S. 1920, § 5527; R.S. 1931, § 94-175; C.S. 1945, § 64-411; W.S. 1957, § 37-271.

Cross references. —

For another provision relating to failure to obey orders of commission, see §

37-12-201

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

37-12-201

.

§ 37-12-213.
Disposition of fines.

All fines, forfeitures and penalties collected under the provisions of this act shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

; and all penalties accruing under this act shall be cumulative of each other, and the suit for the recovery of one (1) penalty shall not be a bar to or affect the recovery of another penalty or forfeiture or be a bar to any criminal prosecution against any such public utility or any officer, director, agent or employee thereof.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 78; C.S. 1920, § 5530; R.S. 1931, § 94-178; C.S. 1945, § 64-414; W.S. 1957, § 37-272; Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

” for “paid into the general fund of the state.”

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

37-12-201

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 79, ch. 146, Laws 1915, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.